Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB397.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.1415 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a school district[school council or, if none exists, the principal] adopts a
curriculum for human sexuality or sexually transmitted diseases, instruction shall
include but not be limited to the following content:
(a) Abstinence from sexual activity is the desirable goal for all school-age
children;
(b) Abstinence from sexual activity is the only certain way to avoid unintended
pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and other associated health
problems;
(c) The best way to avoid sexually transmitted diseases and other associated
health problems is to establish a permanent mutually faithful monogamous
relationship;
(d) A policy to respect parental rights by ensuring that:
1. Children in grade five (5) and below do not receive any instruction
through curriculum or programs on human sexuality or sexually
transmitted diseases; or
2. Any child, regardless of grade level, enrolled in the district does not
receive any instruction or presentation that has a goal or purpose of
students studying or exploring gender identity, gender expression, or
sexual orientation; and
(e) A policy to notify a parent in advance and obtain the parent's written consent
before the parent's child in grade six (6) or above receives any instruction
through curriculum or programs on human sexuality or sexually transmitted
diseases authorized in this section.
(2) Each school district shall adopt health curriculum for students in grade six (6) or
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2025 1:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1523
above that includes instruction on human growth and development. The
instruction on human growth and development shall include a presentation of:
(a) A high-definition ultrasound video, at least three (3) minutes in duration,
showing the development of the brain, heart, sex organs, and other vital
organs in early fetal development; and
(b) An age-appropriate, high-quality, computer-generated rendering or
animation showing the process of human cell fertilization and every stage of
human development inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell
growth and organ development for the duration of the pregnancy until
birth.
(3) Any course, curriculum, or program offered by a public school on the subject of
human sexuality or human growth and development provided by school personnel
or by third parties authorized by the school shall:
(a) Provide an alternative course, curriculum, or program without any penalty to
the student's grade or standing for students whose parents have not provided
written consent as required in subsection (1)(e) of this section;
(b) Be subject to an inspection by parents of participating students that allows
parents to review the following materials:
1. Curriculum;
2. Instructional materials;
3. Lesson plans;
4. Assessments or tests;
5. Surveys or questionnaires;
6. Assignments; and
7. Instructional activities;
(c) Be developmentally appropriate; and
(d) Be limited to a curriculum that has been subject to the reasonable review and
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2025 1:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1523
response by stakeholders in conformity with this subsection and KRS
160.345(2).
(4)[(3)] A public school offering any course, curriculum, or program on the subject of
human sexuality or human growth and development shall provide written
notification to the parents of a student at least two (2) weeks prior to the student's
planned participation in the course, curriculum, or program. The written notification
shall:
(a) Inform the parents of the provisions of subsection (3)[(2)] of this section;
(b) Provide the date the course, curriculum, or program is scheduled to begin;
(c) Detail the process for a parent to review the materials outlined in subsection
(3)[(2)] of this section;
(d) Explain the process for a parent to provide written consent for the student's
participation in the course, curriculum, or program; and
(e) Provide the contact information for the teacher or instructor of the course,
curriculum, or program and a school administrator designated with oversight.
(5)[(4)] Nothing in this section shall prohibit school personnel from:
(a) Discussing human sexuality, including the sexuality of any historic person,
group, or public figure, where the discussion provides necessary context in
relation to a topic of instruction from a curriculum approved pursuant to KRS
160.345; or
(b) Responding to a question from a student during class regarding human
sexuality as it relates to a topic of instruction from a curriculum approved
pursuant to KRS 160.345.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Baby Olivia Act.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2025 1:36 PM Jacketed